Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3304
Animal, defined.

Animal means any animal other than man and includes birds, fish, and reptiles, wild or domestic, living or dead, except domestic poultry.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1086.